Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,306
Nebraska Rules of the Road; applicability to persons operating motorcycles.

(1) Any person who operates a motorcycle shall have all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of any other vehicle under the Nebraska Rules of the Road except for special motorcycle regulations in the rules and except for those provisions of the rules which by their nature can have no application.

(2) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 92;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-692;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 402;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 108.

Helmet requirements, see sections 60-6,278 to 60-6,282.